Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
In General
§ 31-7-13.1.
Dual-phase design-build method of construction contracting; two-phase procedure for awarding contracts; compliance with minimum building code standards; awarding stipulated fees.

The method of contracting for construction described in this section shall be known as the “dual-phase design-build method” of construction contracting. This method of construction contracting may be used only when the Legislature has specifically required or authorized the use of this method in the legislation authorizing a project. At a minimum, the determination must include a detailed explanation of why using the dual-phase design-build method for a particular project satisfies the public need better than the traditional design-bid-build method based on the following criteria:

The project provides a savings in time or cost over traditional methods; and

The size and type of the project is suitable for design-build.

For each proposed dual-phase design-build project, a two-phase procedure for awarding a contract must be adopted. During Phase One, and before solicitation of initial proposals, the agency or governing authority shall develop, with the assistance of an architectural or engineering firm, a scope of work statement that provides prospective offerors with sufficient information regarding the requirements of the agency or governing authority. The scope of work statement must include, but is not limited to, the following information:

Drawings must show overall building dimensions and major lines of dimensions, and site plans that show topography, adjacent buildings and utilities;

Drawings must include information to adequately explain HVAC, electrical and structural requirements;

The scope of work statement also must include building elevations, sections and design details; and

The scope of work statement must include general budget parameters, schedule or delivery requirements, relevant criteria for evaluation of proposals, and any other information necessary to enable the design-builders to submit proposals that meet the needs of the agency or governing authority.

The agency or governing authority shall cause to be published once a week, for at least two (2) consecutive weeks in a regular newspaper published in the county in which the project is to be located, or a newspaper with statewide circulation, a notice inviting proposals for the dual-phase design-build construction project. The proposals shall not be opened in less than fifteen (15) working days after the last notice is published. The notice must inform potential offerors of how to obtain the scope of work statement developed for the project, and the notice must contain such other information to describe adequately the general nature and scope of the project so as to promote full, equal and open competition.

The agency or governing authority shall accept initial proposals only from entities able to provide an experienced and qualified design-build team that includes, at a minimum, an architectural or engineering firm registered in Mississippi and a contractor properly licensed and domiciled in Mississippi for the type of work required. From evaluation of initial proposals under Phase One, the agency or governing authority shall select a minimum of two (2) and a maximum of five (5) design-builders as “short-listed firms” to submit proposals for Phase Two.

During Phase Two, the short-listed firms will be invited to submit detailed designs, specific technical concepts or solutions, pricing, scheduling and other information deemed appropriate by the agency or governing authority as necessary to evaluate and rank acceptability of the Phase Two proposals. After evaluation of these Phase Two proposals, the agency or governing authority shall award a contract to the design-builder determined to offer the best value to the public in accordance with evaluation criteria set forth in the request for proposals, of which price must be one, but not necessarily the only, criterion.

If the agency or governing authority accepts a proposal other than the lowest dollar proposal actually submitted, the agency or governing authority shall enter on its minutes detailed calculations and a narrative summary showing why the accepted proposal was determined to provide the best value, and the agency or governing authority shall state specifically on its minutes the justification for its award.

All facilities that are governed by this section shall be designed and constructed to comply with standards equal to or exceeding the minimum building code standards employed by the state as required under Section 31-11-33 in force at the time of contracting. All private contractors or private entities contracting or performing under this section must comply at all times with all applicable laws, codes and other legal requirements pertaining to the project.

At its discretion, the agency or governing authority may award a stipulated fee equal to a percentage, as prescribed in the request for proposals, of the project’s final design and construction budget, as prescribed in the request for proposals, but not less than two-tenths of one percent (2/10 of 1%) of the project’s final design and construction budget, to each short-list offeror who provides a responsive, but unsuccessful, proposal. If the agency or governing authority does not award a contract, all responsive final list offerors shall receive the stipulated fee based on the owner’s estimate of the project final design and construction budget as included in the request for proposals. The agency or governing authority shall pay the stipulated fee to each offeror within ninety (90) days after the award of the initial contract or the decision not to award a contract. In consideration for paying the stipulated fee, the agency or governing authority may use any ideas or information contained in the proposals in connection with any contract awarded for the project, or in connection with a subsequent procurement, without any obligation to pay any additional compensation to the unsuccessful offerors. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this subsection, an unsuccessful short-list offeror may elect to waive the stipulated fee. If an unsuccessful short-list offeror elects to waive the stipulated fee, the agency or governing authority may not use ideas and information contained in the offeror’s proposal, except that this restriction does not prevent the agency or governing authority from using any idea or information if the idea or information is also included in a proposal of an offeror that accepts the stipulated fee.

This section shall not authorize the awarding of construction contracts according to any contracting method that does not require the contractor to satisfactorily perform, at a minimum, both any balance of design, using an independent professional licensed in Mississippi, and construction of the project for which the contract is awarded.

The provisions of this section shall not affect any procurement by the Mississippi Transportation Commission.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to procurement authorized in Section 59-5-37(3).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 494, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 544, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 9, 2008).

§ 31-7-13.2.
Construction manager at risk method of project delivery; qualifications-based selection procedure for procuring architectural, engineering and land surveying services.

When used in this section, “construction manager at risk” means a method of project delivery in which a construction manager guarantees a maximum price for the construction of a project and in which the governing authority or board, before using this method of project delivery, shall include a detailed explanation of why using the construction manager at risk method of project delivery for a particular project satisfies the public need better than that traditional design-bid-build method based on the following criteria:

The use of construction manager at risk for the project provides a savings in time or cost over traditional methods; and

The size and type of the project is suitable for use of the construction management at risk method of project delivery.

When the construction manager at risk method of project delivery is used:

There may be a separate contract for design services and a separate contract for construction services;

The contract for construction services may be entered into at the same time as a contract for the design services or later;

Design and construction of the project may be in sequential or concurrent phases; and

Finance, maintenance, operation, reconstruction or other related services may be included for a guaranteed maximum price.

When procuring design professional services under a construction manager at risk project delivery method, the agency or governing authority shall procure the services of a design professional pursuant to qualifications-based selection procedures.

Before the substantial completion of the design documents, the agency or governing authority may elect to hire a construction manager.

When procuring construction management services, the agency or governing authority shall follow the qualifications-based selection procedures as outlined in subsection (10) of this section or the competitive sealed proposal procedures as outlined in Section 31-7-13.

The agency or governing authority may require the architect or engineer and the construction manager, by contract, to cooperate in the design, planning and scheduling, and construction process. The contract shall not make the primary designer or construction manager a subcontractor or joint venture partner to the other or limit the primary designer’s or construction manager’s independent obligations to the agency or governing authority.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter:

Each project for construction under a construction manager at risk contract shall be a specific, single project with a minimum construction cost of Twenty-Five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00).

Each project under a construction manager at risk contract shall be a specific, single project. For the purposes of this paragraph, “specific, single project” means a project that is constructed at a single location, at a common location or for a common purpose.

Agencies shall retain an independent architectural or engineering firm to provide guidance and administration of the professional engineering or professional architecture aspects of the project throughout the development of the scope, design, and construction of the project.

The state shall, on an annual basis, compile and make public all proceedings, records, contracts and other public records relating to procurement transactions authorized under this section.

For purposes of this section, the “qualifications-based selection procedure” shall include:

Publicly announcing all requirements for architectural, engineering, and land surveying services, to procure these services on the basis of demonstrated competence and qualifications, and to negotiate contracts at fair and reasonable prices after the most qualified firm has been selected.

Agencies or governing authorities shall establish procedures to prequalify firms seeking to provide architectural, engineering, and land surveying services or may use prequalification lists from other state agencies or governing authorities to meet the requirements of this section.

Whenever a project requiring architectural, engineering, or land surveying services is proposed for an agency or governing authority, the agency or governing authority shall provide advance notice published in a professional services bulletin or advertised within the official state newspaper setting forth the projects and services to be procured for not less than fourteen (14) days. The professional services bulletin shall be mailed to each firm that has requested the information or is prequalified under Section 31-7-13. The professional services bulletin shall include a description of each project and shall state the time and place for interested firms to submit a letter of interest and, if required by the public notice, a statement of qualifications.

The agency or governing authority shall evaluate the firms submitting letters of interest and other prequalified firms, taking into account qualifications. The agency or governing authority may consider, but shall not be limited to, considering:

Ability of professional personnel;

Past record and experience;

Performance data on file;

Willingness to meet time requirements;

Location;

Workload of the firm; and

Any other qualifications-based factors as the agency or governing authority may determine in writing are applicable.

The agency or governing authority may conduct discussions with and require public presentations by firms deemed to be the most qualified regarding their qualifications, approach to the project and ability to furnish the required services.

The agency or governing authority shall establish a committee to select firms to provide architectural, engineering, and land surveying services. A selection committee may include at least one (1) public member nominated by a statewide association of the profession affected. The public member may not be employed or associated with any firm holding a contract with the agency or governing authority nor may the public member’s firm be considered for a contract with that agency or governing authority while serving as a public member of the committee. In no case shall the agency or governing authority, before selecting a firm for negotiation under paragraph (f) of this section, seek formal or informal submission of verbal or written estimates of costs or proposals in terms of dollars, hours required, percentage of construction cost, or any other measure of compensation.

On the basis of evaluations, discussions, and any presentations, the agency or governing authority shall select no less than three (3) firms that it determines to be qualified to provide services for the project and rank them in order of qualifications to provide services regarding the specific project. The agency or governing authority shall then contact the firm ranked most preferred to negotiate a contract at a fair and reasonable compensation. If fewer than three (3) firms submit letters of interest and the agency or governing authority determines that one (1) or both of those firms are so qualified, the agency or governing authority may proceed to negotiate a contract under paragraph (g) of this section.

The agency or governing authority shall prepare a written description of the scope of the proposed services to be used as a basis for negotiations and shall negotiate a contract with the highest qualified firm at compensation that the agency or governing authority determines in writing to be fair and reasonable. In making this decision, the agency or governing authority shall take into account the estimated value, scope, complexity, and professional nature of the services to be rendered. In no case may the agency or governing authority establish a maximum overhead rate or other payment formula designed to eliminate firms from contention or restrict competition or negotiation of fees. If the agency or governing authority is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the firm that is most preferred, negotiations with that firm shall be terminated. The agency or governing authority shall then begin negotiations with the firm that is next preferred. If the agency or governing authority is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with that firm, negotiations with that firm shall be terminated. The agency or governing authority shall then begin negotiations with the firm that is next preferred. If the agency or governing authority is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with any of the selected firms, the agency or governing authority shall reevaluate the architectural, engineering, or land surveying services requested, including the estimated value, scope, complexity, and fee requirements. The agency or governing authority shall then compile a second list of not less than three (3) qualified firms and proceed in accordance with the provisions of this section. A firm negotiating a contract with an agency or governing authority shall negotiate subcontracts for architectural, engineering, and land surveying services at compensation that the firm determines in writing to be fair and reasonable based upon a written description of the scope of the proposed services.

The provisions of this section shall not affect any procurement by the Mississippi Transportation Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 494, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 31-7-13.3
Fee for electronic
submission of bids; fee charged winning bidder for participation in
reverse auction.

Any governingauthority accepting electronic bid submissions for procurements maycharge the bidder a fee, or may require a fee to be paid to a third-partyservice provider, for an electronic bid submission. The amount ofthe fee shall not exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) per bid.

Any governingauthority using the reverse auction method of procurement may chargethe winning bidder a fee, or require the winning bidder to pay a feeto a third-party service provider, for participation in a reverseauction. The amount of the fee shall notexceed four percent (4%) of the winning bid amount.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 306, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 5, 2018).

§ 31-7-14.
Public contracts of energy efficiency services [Repealed effective July 1, 2021].

For purposes of this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meaning ascribed herein, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

Approval by the division of an energy services provider shall be granted in a prequalification process.

Such energy services providers may petition the division to review their qualifications and deem them to be qualified for inclusion on a prequalification list if they meet the qualifications set forth by the division.

Any energy services project that has been competitively bid and awarded prior to any change in law shall be allowed to continue under the laws current at the time the project was awarded.

The division shall ensure that small businesses are not disadvantaged in the determination of a qualified energy services provider.

“Division” means the Energy Division of the Mississippi Development Authority.

“Energy services” or “energy efficient services” means energy efficiency equipment, services relating to the installation, operation and maintenance of equipment and improvements reasonably required to existing or new equipment and existing or new improvements and facilities including, but not limited to, heating, ventilation and air-conditioning systems, lighting, windows, insulation and energy management controls, life safety measures that provide long-term, operating-cost reductions, building operation programs that reduce operating costs, alternative fuel motor vehicles including vehicles that have been converted to such and ancillary equipment related to or associated with the fueling of alternative fuel motor vehicles, or other energy-conservation-related improvements, including improvements or equipment related to renewable energy, water and other natural resources conservation, including accuracy and measurement of water distribution and/or consumption, and other equipment, services and improvements providing verifiable cost savings.

“Energy services provider” means a person or business with a successful record of documented energy savings projects that is experienced in the design, implementation and installation of energy conservation measures; has the technical capabilities to verify that such measures generate energy and operational cost savings or enhanced revenues; has the ability to guarantee the savings; has the ability to secure or arrange the financing necessary to support the implementation of the energy conservation measures; and is approved by the division.

“Entity” means the board of trustees of any public school district, junior college, institution of higher learning, publicly owned hospital, state agency or governmental authority under this chapter.

“Energy services contract” means an agreement to provide energy services which include, but are not limited to, the design, installation, financing and maintenance or management of the energy systems or equipment in order to improve its energy efficiency. Payments for the contract are not contingent upon the actual savings realized from the equipment.

“Energy performance contract” means an agreement to provide energy services which includes, but is not limited to, the design, installation, financing and maintenance or management of the energy systems or equipment in order to improve its energy efficiency.

“Shared-savings contract” means an agreement where the contractor and the entity each receive a preagreed percentage or dollar value of the energy cost savings over the life of the contract.

“Reduce operating costs” means elimination of future expenses or avoidance of future replacement expenditures as a result of new equipment installed or services performed. Material savings, labor savings, cancelled maintenance contracts, et cetera, shall be considered as being viable to reduce operating costs. Reduce operating costs may be included in the performance contract or energy services agreement solely at the discretion of the entity. A contract that otherwise satisfies the requirements of this section shall satisfy the requirements allowing use of an energy performance, energy services or shared-savings contract even if the sole expense being eliminated is maintenance expense.

“Capital cost avoidance” means planned capital improvement expenditures that will be avoided through implementation of the energy services project. Capital cost avoidance may be included in an energy services contract or an energy performance contract solely at the discretion of the entity. Capital cost avoidance may be claimed as an annual avoidance or as a one-time avoidance in a specific year of the contract term, depending upon the nature of the avoided capital cost.

“Alternative fuel motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle propelled by alternative fuel either as a dedicated alternative fuel vehicle, as a bi-fuel vehicle using alternative fuel as one of its fuels, or as a dual fuel vehicle using alternative fuel as one of its fuels.

“Energy conservation measure” means the individual items or components of a large energy services or energy efficient services program.

“Simple payback period” means the amount of time for the recuperation of the initial investment. The simple payback period is calculated by dividing the initial investment by the annual savings. The simple payback period for any contract shall not exceed twenty (20) years. The simple payback period of an individual energy conservation measure shall not be considered in any evaluation provided the simple payback period for the contract does not exceed twenty (20) years.

An entity may enter into an energy services contract, energy performance contract, shared-savings contract, any of which may contain a lease, or lease-purchase contract for energy efficiency equipment, services relating to the installation, operation and maintenance of equipment or improvements reasonably required to existing or new equipment and existing or new improvements and facilities and shall contract in accordance with the following provisions:

The division may assemble a list of prequalified energy services providers. The division shall use objective criteria in the selection process. The criteria for evaluation shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following factors: to assess the capability of the qualified energy services provider in the area of design engineering, installation, maintenance and repairs associated with energy services or guaranteed energy performance contracts; qualifications including engineering depth and experience, post-installation project monitoring, data collection, and verification of and reporting of savings; overall project experience and qualifications; management capability; ability to access long-term sources of project financing; financial health and stability, litigation history with customers and other factors determined by the division to be relevant and appropriate and related to the ability to perform the project. The division shall either accept or reject an application for prequalification from an energy services provider within sixty (60) days after receipt. If the division fails to act within sixty (60) days from the date of receiving an application, then the application shall automatically be accepted and the energy services provider shall be added to the prequalified list.

An entity shall publicly issue requests for proposals, advertised in the same manner as provided in Section 31-7-13 for seeking competitive sealed bids, concerning the provision of energy efficiency services relating to the installation, operation and maintenance of equipment, improvements reasonably required to existing or new equipment and existing or new improvements and facilities or the design, installation, ownership, operation and maintenance of energy efficiency equipment. Those requests for proposals shall contain terms and conditions relating to submission of proposals, evaluation and selection of proposals, financial terms, legal responsibilities, and any other matters as the entity determines to be appropriate for inclusion.

Upon receiving responses to the request for proposals, the entity may select the most qualified proposal or proposals on the basis of experience and qualifications of the proposers, the technical approach, the financial arrangements, the overall benefits to the entity and any other relevant factors determined to be appropriate.

An entity shall negotiate and enter into contracts with the person, persons, firm or firms submitting the proposal selected as the most qualified under this section.

The annual rate of interest paid under any lease-purchase agreement authorized by this section shall not exceed the maximum interest rate to maturity on general obligation indebtedness permitted under Section 75-17-101.

The maximum lease-purchase term for any equipment acquired under this section shall not exceed the lesser of twenty (20) years or the average useful life of the energy conservation measures from the date the energy conservation measures have been completed and accepted by the governmental unit.

This subsection shall, with respect to the procurement of energy efficiency services and/or equipment, supersede any contradictory or conflicting provisions of Chapter 7, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, and other laws with respect to awarding public contracts.

The division may contract with a party selected under this subsection to provide financing to entities and private “nonprofit” hospitals, to purchase energy efficiency equipment, services relating to the installation, operation and maintenance of equipment or improvements reasonably required to existing or new equipment and existing or new improvements and facilities or an energy saving performance contract, energy services contract, or lease-purchase basis. Any energy efficiency lease financing contract entered into by the division before May 15, 1992, shall be valid and binding when the contract was entered into under this subsection.

The entities and private “nonprofit” hospitals that decide to contract for energy efficiency equipment, services relating to the installation, operation and maintenance of equipment or improvements reasonably required to existing or new equipment and existing or new improvements and facilities on a lease, energy services contract or lease-purchase basis, may request financial assistance from the division.

The provisions of any energy efficiency lease-purchase agreements authorized under this subsection (2) shall comply with the requirements of subsection (1)(b)(v) of this section. The term of any lease or lease-purchase agreement for energy efficiency services and/or equipment entered into under this section shall not exceed twenty (20) years, commencing on the completion of the installation of equipment or improvements under the contract.

Any entity or private “nonprofit” hospital having approval of the division may borrow money in anticipation of entering into a lease-purchase agreement pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section. Any borrowing may be upon terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the borrowing entity and the party advancing interim funds; however, the principal on any borrowing shall be repaid within a period of time not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days. In borrowing money under this paragraph (d), it is not necessary to publish notice of intention to do so or to secure the consent of the qualified electors, either by election or otherwise. Any borrowing may be negotiated between the parties and is not required to be publicly bid, may be evidenced by negotiable notes or lease and shall not be considered when computing any limitation of indebtedness of the borrowing entity established by law. The principal, interest and costs of incurring any borrowing shall not exceed the principal amount of the final contract or agreement approved by the division, and accepted by the borrowing entity, under subsection (2)(b) of this section.

This subsection (2) shall, with respect to the procurement of energy efficiency services and/or equipment, supersede the provisions of any contradictory or conflicting provisions of Chapter 7, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, and other laws with respect to awarding public contracts.

All lease-purchase agreements authorized by this section and the income from those agreements shall be exempt from all taxation within the State of Mississippi, except gift, transfer and inheritance taxes.

An entity may contract for energy efficiency equipment services relating to the installation, operation or maintenance of equipment or improvements reasonably required to existing or new equipment and existing or new improvements and facilities on a shared-savings basis or performance basis.

If an entity decides to enter into a contract for energy efficiency equipment, services relating to the installation, operation or maintenance of equipment or improvements reasonably required to existing or new equipment and existing or new improvements and facilities on a shared-savings basis or performance basis, the entity shall issue a request for proposals or a request for qualifications, as determined necessary by the division, in the same manner as prescribed under subsection (1)(b) of this section. The entity shall notify the division in writing of its intention to issue a request for proposals or a request for qualifications.

The terms of any shared-savings contract, energy services contract, or energy performance contract entered into under this section may not exceed twenty (20) years, commencing on the completion of the installation of equipment or improvements under the contract.

The terms of any shared-savings or energy performance contract entered into under this section must contain a guarantee of savings clause from the company providing energy efficiency equipment services relating to the installation, operation and maintenance of equipment or improvements reasonably required to existing or new equipment and existing or new improvements and facilities.

By March 1 and September 1 of each year, each entity that enters into an energy performance contract or shared-savings contract shall report to the division its energy usage by meter in dollars and consumption by fuel type for the previous six-month period determined by the division.

The division shall remove qualified status of an energy services provider that fails to meet the reporting requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection after two (2) such violations.

Any costs associated with the reporting made under this subsection (5) shall be paid by the energy services provider.

The contract may be construed to provide flexibility to public agencies in structuring agreements entered into hereunder so that economic benefits may be maximized.

This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2021.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 493, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 571 § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 405, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 593, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 503, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 503, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 481, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 424, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 379, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 31-7-14.1.
Division of Energy and Transportation authorized to establish energy savings incentive program.

Any agency as defined in this chapter that receives state budgetary consideration and has submitted a detailed energy management plan to the Energy Division of the Department of Economic and Community Development, referred to in this section as “division,” as required under Section 57-39-111 shall undertake energy efficiency projects for the purpose of producing energy and/or dollar savings whereby a portion of the savings may be retained by the participating agency. The plan shall describe specific measures to be implemented to reduce the agency’s energy consumption by energy unit measure or energy cost. The division shall provide assistance in preparing the detailed energy management plan according to prescribed guidelines and reporting procedures. The plan shall specify a project description of the energy efficiency measures to be undertaken, including, but not limited to, type of measure, cost, estimated savings in dollars and energy units, project and measure location, and terms and conditions of project financing.

Utilizing data submitted under Sections 57-39-107 and 57-39-109, the division shall develop and approve energy consumption baselines before project implementation, if feasible, and measure energy consumption after project implementation considering adjustments for any agency growth or reduction and seasonal variances, and calculate total energy savings. The division shall derive a baseline use allocation to be utilized and submitted in each participating agency’s annual budget.

For purposes of this section, “net savings” and “net revenues” mean any funds remaining after payment of project capital costs, including debt service, and other payments and reserves as required by a bond resolution, loan agreement or other financing agreement and payment of project operating and maintenance expenses.

Net savings and net revenues generated from projects shall be apportioned as follows:

Any agency initiating energy savings through the implementation of an energy efficiency project may retain one-half (1/2) of all such net savings which may be used for any nonrecurring capital projects; and

The remaining net savings and net revenues from conservation projects shall be remitted to the State General Fund.

The Energy Division shall verify the net savings and net revenues on an annual basis.

The use by an agency of net savings and net revenues from energy efficiency projects shall be in addition to, and shall not supplant or replace, funding from traditional sources for their normal operations and maintenance or capital budgets. It is the intent of this subsection to ensure that the agencies receive the full benefit intended by this section, and that the effect will not be diminished by budget adjustments inconsistent with this intent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 584, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 593, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 518, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 30, 2001).

§ 31-7-15.
Preferences for awarding contracts for commodities; procurement of products made from recovered materials; state agencies to purchase products manufactured or sold by Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever economically feasible.

Whenever two (2) or more competitive bids are received, one or more of which relates to commodities grown, processed or manufactured within this state, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the commodities grown, processed or manufactured within this state shall be given preference. A similar preference shall be given to commodities grown, processed or manufactured within this state whenever purchases are made without competitive bids, and when practical the Department of Finance and Administration may by regulation establish reasonable preferential policies for other commodities, giving preference to resident suppliers of this state.

Any foreign manufacturing company with a factory in the state and with over fifty (50) employees working in the state shall have preference over any other foreign company where both price and quality are the same, regardless of where the product is manufactured.

On or before January 1, 1991, the Department of Finance and Administration shall adopt bid and product specifications to be utilized by all state agencies that encourage the procurement of commodities made from recovered materials. Preference in awarding contracts for commodities shall be given to commodities offered at a competitive price.

Each state agency is required to procure products made from recovered materials when those products are available at a competitive price. For purposes of this subsection, “competitive price” means a price not greater than ten percent (10%) above the lowest and best bidder. A decision not to procure products made from recovered materials must be based on a determination that such procurement:

Is not available within a reasonable period of time; or

Fails to meet the performance standards set forth in the applicable specifications; or

Is not available at a competitive price.

Whenever economically feasible, each state agency is required to purchase products manufactured or sold by the Mississippi Industries for the Blind.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9024-08; Laws, 1962, ch. 497, § 8; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 72; Laws, 1990, ch. 507, § 11; Laws, 1992, ch. 414 § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 473, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 31-7-16.
Purchase of certain equipment capable of being manufactured or assembled in separate units.

In the event equipment is required which is capable of being manufactured or assembled in separate units such as school bus chassis and bodies or other bodies of equipment installed upon chassis, and there is a manufacturer of such bodies located within the State of Mississippi, a public purchase may be made of such chassis and such body or equipment as separate items.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 31-7-17.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14 § 74, eff from and after passage (approved August 16, 1988).

[Codes, 1942, § 9024-09; Laws, 1962, ch. 497, § 9]